local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="leteč/i_adj">
      <!-- masculine -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- feminine -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- neuter -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Adjectives to fix -->
    <pardef n="hlad/an__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niji</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niji</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nija</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nije</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>no</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nije</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nija</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->

    <pardef n="/biti__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sam</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smo</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>su</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="mo/ći__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>gu</l>
         <r>ći<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>žeš</l>
         <r>ći<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>že</l>
         <r>ći<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>žemo</l>
         <r>ći<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>žete</l>
         <r>ći<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>gu</l>
         <r>ći<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="leteči"><i>leteč</i><par n="leteč/i_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="moći"><i>mo</i><par n="mo/ći__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="biti"><i/><par n="/biti__vbser"/></e>
